Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 95.
[TERMS, ELECTION, AND ELIGIBILITY OF ELECTED OFFICIALS] (CONST., ART. 3, §
13 and ART. 7, §
53, ADDED; CONST., ART. 5, §
9, ART. 7, §§
19, 29, 46, and AMEND. 41, AMENDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment, effective January 1, 2017, added Ark. Const., Art. 3, § 13 and Art. 7, §
53; and amended Art. 5, § 9, Art. 7, §§ 19, 29, 46, and Amend. 41. The amendments are incorporated within those sections. Amendment 95 was proposed by H.J.R. 1027 during the 2015 Regular Session and adopted at the 2016 general election by a vote of 747,856 for and 317,093 against.

Amend. 95, § 8, provided: “EFFECTIVE DATE.

“(a)

This amendment shall be effective on and after January 1, 2017.

“(b)

Persons elected to the following offices at the 2016 general election shall serve terms of two (2) years:

“(1)

County judge;

“(2)

Sheriff;

“(3)

Circuit clerk;

“(4)

County clerk;

“(5)

Assessor;

“(6)

Coroner;

“(7)

Treasurer;

“(8)

County surveyor; and

“(9)

Collector of taxes.

“(c)

Persons elected to the following offices at the 2018 general election shall serve terms of four (4) years:

“(1)

County judge;

“(2)

Sheriff;

“(3)

Circuit clerk;

“(4)

County clerk;

“(5)

Assessor;

“(6)

Coroner;

“(7)

Treasurer;

“(8)

County surveyor; and

“(9)

Collector of taxes.”

The bracketed heading was added by the Publisher.